West Virginia, session 2025, HB2856.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. PRE-EMPTION OF CONFLICTING LOCAL ORDINANCES AND PRIVATE RESTRICTIONS. §31G-6-1. Pre-emption in favor of broadband services; construction of language in agreements; installation of telecommunication facilities; preservation of eminent domain rights. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of the West Virginia Code or the West Virginia Code of State Rules to the contrary, any ordinance of any political subdivision relating to broadband service is hereby pre-empted to the extent necessary in favor of such broadband installation. (b) No corporate policy, organizational policy, institutional policy, agreement, contract, or other like document, including the rules and regulations of any Home Owners Association, or any similar entity or organization, promulgated or made effective after the effective date of this section, may regulate or prevent the exterior installation of antennas and equipment necessary to or typically utilized for broadband deployment and the terms of any such document shall be strictly construed in favor of encouraging and assisting broadband installation and deployment.(c) The installation of telecommunications facilities, including any cable, line, fiber, wire, conduit, innerduct, handhole or pedestal that is used to transmit, receive, produce or distribute a signal for telecommunications purposes via wireline, electronic, or optical means, which does not adversely affect the conservation values of protected property, shall not be unreasonably withheld by the conservation easement holder. Such permission can be affected through the conservation easement language; through a conservation plan which addresses both location and depth of the fiber optics installation; or through court action for those easements already recorded where permission to install is prohibited by existing conservation easement language. In addition, nothing in this section shall prohibit a broadband provider offering telephone and other communications services from exercising their existing eminent domain rights as a public use under §54-1-2 of this code. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home